District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.11

Repealed

District Department of Transportation Unified Fund.

Repealed.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 9c, formerly § 11b
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 6062, 52 DCR 7503
renumbered Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 5(t)(2), 53 DCR 6794
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 6003(b), 54 DCR 7052
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 6015, 55 DCR 7598
Dec. 24, 2008, D.C. Law 17-284, § 3, 55 DCR 11983
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111,§ 6031, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, §§ 6002, 6023, 57 DCR 6242
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 626(b), 58 DCR 1008
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Public Space Rental Fees Temporary Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Law 17-263, November 19, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 12583).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 203 of (D.C. Law 17-326, March 21, 2009, law notification 56 DCR 3037).
Section 502 of D.C. Law 18-222, in subsec. (c)(2) substituted “all revenue derived from the sales and use taxes collected by the District for parking and storing; provided, that of the first $30 million collected each year, $12.7 million in fiscal year 2009, $12.2 million in fiscal year 2010, and $10.2 million in all subsequent fiscal years shall remain in the General Fund of the District of Columbia and that any revenue in excess of $30 million shall be deposited into the Highway Trust Fund” for “100% of the sales and use taxes collected by the District for parking and storing; provided, that any such revenues in excess of $30 million shall be deposited into the Highway Trust Fund”.
Section 2002(b) of D.C. Law 18-222 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6062 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6003(b) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 3 of Public Space Rental Fees Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-460, July 28, 2008, 55 DCR 8729).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203 of Fiscal Year 2009 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-572, December 2, 2008, 55 DCR 12452).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203 of Fiscal Year 2009 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-13, February 23, 2009, 56 DCR 1920).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6031 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6031 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 502 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 502 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 6002, 6023 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 626(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see § 626(c) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7016 of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).

Short title: Section 6014 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle E of title VI of the act may be cited as the “District Department of Transportation Unified Fund Amendment Act of 2008”.

Short title: Section 6030 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle D of title VI of the act may be cited as the “District Department of Transportation Establishment Amendment Act of 2009”.

Short title: Section 6001 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle A of title VI of the act may be cited as the “District Department of Transportation Unified Fund Amendment Act of 2010”.

Section 4 of D.C. Law 17-284 provided that sections 2 and 3 shall apply as of July 1, 2008.

Section 629 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided: “Sec. 629. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2011; except, that sections 622 and 623(a)(2) shall apply as of the effective date of this act.”